Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.045

Disposal of unusable pesticides—Rules.

The director of agriculture may adopt rules to allow the department of agriculture to take possession and dispose of canceled, suspended, or otherwise unusable pesticides held by persons licensed under chapter 15.58 RCW or regulated under chapter 17.21 RCW. For purposes of this section, the department may become licensed as a hazardous waste generator. The department may set fees to cover expenses in connection with pesticide waste received from persons licensed under chapter 15.58 RCW.

[ 1989 c 354 s 57.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.